Vermont, session 2025-2026, H506.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER ADOPTION APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the adoption of the charter of the Town of
Charlotte as set forth in this act. Voters approved the adoption of the charter
on March 4, 2025.
VT LEG #382498 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.506
2025 Page 2 of 3
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 110 is added to read:
CHAPTER 110. TOWN OF CHARLOTTE
§ 1. CORPORATE EXISTENCE RETAINED
(a) Pursuant to the authority granted by the General Assembly, there is
hereby enacted a charter to govern the organization and operation of local
government in the Town of Charlotte.
(b) The inhabitants of the Town, within the geographical limits as now
established, shall continue to be a municipal corporation by the name of the
Town of Charlotte.
§ 2. GENERAL PROVISIONS
(a) Except when changed, enlarged, or modified by the provisions of this
charter, all provisions of State statute relating to municipalities shall apply to
the Town.
(b) The Town shall have all the powers granted to towns and municipal
corporations by the Vermont Constitution, State law, and this charter, together
with all implied powers necessary to carry into execution all of the powers
granted. The Town may enact ordinances not inconsistent with the
Constitution of the State or this charter and may impose penalties for the
violation of those ordinances.
VT LEG #382498 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.506
2025 Page 3 of 3
(c) In this charter, any mention of a particular power shall not be construed
to restrict the scope of the powers that the Town would have if the particular
power were not mentioned, unless this charter otherwise provides.
(d) Nothing in this charter shall be construed to in any way limit the powers
and functions conferred on the Town, the Selectboard, or Town elected or
appointed officers by general or special enactment of State statutes or
regulations in force or effect or later enacted, and the powers and functions
conferred by this charter shall be cumulative and in addition to the provisions
of the general or special enactment unless this charter otherwise provides.
§ 3. ROUTINE ADOPTION OF LAND USE BYLAWS
The Town shall adopt bylaws, as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4303; bylaw
amendments; or bylaw repeals by vote of the Town by Australian ballot at a
special or regular meeting duly warned on the issue.
§ 4. SEPARABILITY
If any provision of this charter is held invalid, the other provisions of the
charter shall not be affected.
§ 5. AMENDMENT
Amendment of this charter shall be as provided by Vermont law.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #382498 v.1